Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 6. Alaska Retirement Management Board.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska retirement management investment board, see 15 AAC 112.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the enactment of AS

37.10.210

—

37.10.390

by § 1, ch. 31, SLA 1992 (HCS CSSB 329 (FIN)), see 1992 Senate Journal, p. 1872.

Sec. 37.10.210.
Alaska Retirement Management Board.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board is established in the Department of Revenue. The board’s primary mission is to serve as the trustee of the assets of the state’s retirement systems, the State of Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan, and the deferred compensation program for state employees, and the Alaska retiree health care trusts established under AS

39.30.097

. Consistent with standards of prudence, the board has the fiduciary obligation to manage and invest these assets in a manner that is sufficient to meet the liabilities and pension obligations of the systems, plan, program, and trusts. The board may, with the approval of the commissioner of revenue and upon agreement with the responsible fiduciary, manage and invest other state funds so long as the activity does not interfere with the board’s primary mission. In making investments, the board shall exercise the powers and duties of a fiduciary of a state fund under AS

37.10.071

.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board consists of nine trustees, as follows:

two members, consisting of the commissioner of administration and the commissioner of revenue;

seven trustees appointed by the governor who meet the eligibility requirements for an Alaska permanent fund dividend and who are professionally credentialed or have recognized competence in investment management, finance, banking, economics, accounting, pension administration, or actuarial analysis as follows:

two trustees who are members of the general public; the trustees appointed under this subparagraph may not hold another state office, position, or employment and may not be members or beneficiaries of a retirement system managed by the board;

one trustee who is employed as a finance officer for a political subdivision participating in either the public employees’ retirement system or the teachers’ retirement system;

two trustees who are members of the public employees’ retirement system, selected from a list of four nominees submitted from among the public employees’ retirement system bargaining units;

two trustees who are members of the teachers’ retirement system selected from a list of four nominees submitted from among the teachers’ retirement system bargaining units;

the lists of the nominees shall be submitted to the governor under (C) and (D) of this paragraph within the time period specified in regulations adopted under AS

37.10.240(a)

.

The trustees, other than the two commissioners, shall serve for staggered terms of four years and may be reappointed to the board.

The governor may, by written notice to the trustee, remove an appointed trustee for cause. After an appointed trustee receives written notice of removal, the trustee may not participate in board business and may not be counted for purposes of establishing a quorum.

A vacancy on the board of trustees shall be promptly filled. A person filling a vacancy holds office for the balance of the unexpired term of the person’s predecessor. A vacancy on the board does not impair the authority of a quorum of the board to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the board.

Five trustees constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the exercise of the powers and duties of the board.

A trustee may not designate another person to serve on the board in the absence of the trustee.

The board shall provide annual training to its members on the duties and powers of a fiduciary of a state fund and other training as necessary to keep the members of the board educated about pension management and investment.

The board shall elect a trustee to serve as chair and a trustee to serve as vice-chair for one-year terms. A trustee may be reelected to serve additional terms as chair or vice-chair.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 58 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 49 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For board nominations, see 15 AAC 112, art. 1.

Sec. 37.10.215.
Attorney general.

The attorney general is the legal counsel for the board and shall advise the board and represent it in a legal proceeding.

History.

(§ 59 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, provides that this section is retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 37.10.220.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall

hold regular and special meetings at the call of the chair or of at least five members; meetings are open to the public, and the board shall keep a full record of all its proceedings;

after reviewing recommendations from the Department of Revenue, adopt investment policies for each of the funds entrusted to the board;

determine the appropriate investment objectives for the defined benefit plans established under the teachers’ retirement system under AS 14.25 and the public employees’ retirement system under AS 39.35;

assist in prescribing the policies for the proper operation of the systems and take other actions necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of the systems in accordance with AS

37.10.210

—

37.10.390

;

provide a range of investment options and establish the rules by which participants can direct their investments among those options with respect to accounts established under

AS

14.25.340

—

14.25.350

(teachers’ retirement system defined contribution individual accounts);

AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

(State of Alaska Supplementary Annuity Plan);

AS

39.35.730

—

39.35.750

(public employees’ retirement system defined contribution individual accounts); and

AS

39.45.010

—

39.45.060

(public employees’ deferred compensation program);

establish the rate of interest that shall be annually credited to each member’s individual contribution account in accordance with AS

14.25.145

and AS

39.35.100

and the rate of interest that shall be annually credited to each member’s account in the health reimbursement arrangement plan under AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

; the rate of interest shall be adopted on the basis of the probable effective rate of interest on a long-term basis, and the rate may be changed from time to time;

adopt a contribution surcharge as necessary under AS

39.35.160(c)

;

coordinate with the retirement system administrator to have an annual actuarial valuation of each retirement system prepared to determine system assets, accrued liabilities, and funding ratios and to certify to the appropriate budgetary authority of each employer in the system

an appropriate contribution rate for normal costs; and

an appropriate contribution rate for liquidating any past service liability; in this subparagraph, the appropriate contribution rate for liquidating the past service liability of the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

or the past service liability of the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

must be determined by a level percent of pay method based on amortization of the past service liability for a closed term of 25 years;

review actuarial assumptions prepared and certified by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and conduct experience analyses of the retirement systems not less than once every four years, except for health cost assumptions, which shall be reviewed annually; the results of all actuarial assumptions prepared under this paragraph shall be reviewed and certified by a second member of the American Academy of Actuaries before presentation to the board;

contract for an independent audit of the state’s actuary not less than once every four years;

contract for an independent audit of the state’s performance consultant not less than once every four years;

obtain an external performance review to evaluate the investment policies of each fund entrusted to the board and report the results of the review to the appropriate fund fiduciary;

by the first day of each regular legislative session, report to the governor, the legislature, and the individual employers participating in the state’s retirement systems on the financial condition of the systems in regard to

the valuation of trust fund assets and liabilities;

current investment policies adopted by the board;

a summary of assets held in trust listed by the categories of investment;

the income and expenditures for the previous fiscal year;

the return projections for the next calendar year;

one-year, three-year, five-year, and 10-year investment performance for each of the funds entrusted to the board; and

other statistical data necessary for a proper understanding of the financial status of the systems;

submit quarterly updates of the investment performance reports to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee;

develop an annual operating budget; and

administer pension forfeitures required under AS

37.10.310

using the procedures of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The board may

employ outside investment advisors to review investment policies;

enter into an agreement with the fiduciary of another state fund in order to assume the management and investment of those assets;

contract for other services necessary to execute the board’s powers and duties;

enter into confidentiality agreements that would exempt records from AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

if the records contain information that could affect the value of investment by the board or that could impair the ability of the board to acquire, maintain, or dispose of investments.

Expenses for the board and the operations of the board shall be paid from the retirement fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 61 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 60, 61 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 49 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.10.230.
Conflicts of interest.

Trustees are subject to the provisions of AS 39.50.

If a trustee acquires, owns, or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in an entity or project in which assets under the control of the board are invested, the trustee shall immediately disclose the interest to the board. The disclosure is a matter of public record and shall be included in the minutes of the board meeting next following the disclosure. The board shall adopt regulations to restrict trustees from having a substantial interest in an entity or project in which assets under the control of the board are invested.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For conflict of interest prohibitions, see 15 AAC 112, art. 3.

Sec. 37.10.240.
Regulations and open meetings.

The board may adopt regulations to implement AS

37.10.210

—

37.10.390

. Regulations adopted by the board are not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62). The board shall adopt regulations required by AS

36.30.015(f)

relating to procurement. The board shall comply with the requirements of AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act).

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a regulation adopted under AS

37.10.210

—

37.10.390

shall be published in the Alaska Administrative Register and Alaska Administrative Code for informational purposes. A regulation adopted under this section shall conform to the style and format requirements of the drafting manual for administrative regulations that is published under AS

44.62.050

.

At least 30 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under this chapter, the board shall provide notice of the action that is being considered. The notice must include publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each judicial district of the state.

A regulation adopted under this chapter takes effect 30 days after adoption by the board unless a later effective date is stated in the regulation.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a regulation may be adopted, amended, or repealed, effective immediately, as an emergency regulation. For an emergency regulation to be effective the board must find that the immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation is necessary. The board shall, within 10 days after adoption of an emergency regulation, give notice of the adoption under (c) of this section. An emergency regulation adopted under this subsection may not remain in effect past the date of the next regular meeting of the board unless the board complies with the procedures set out in this section and adopts the regulation as a permanent regulation.

In this section, “regulation” has the meaning given in AS

44.62.640(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For board nominations, see 15 AAC 112, art. 1.

For procurement, see 15 AAC 112, art. 2.

Sec. 37.10.250.
Compensation of trustees.

Trustees, other than trustees who are employees of the state, a political subdivision of the state, or a school district or regional educational attendance area in the state, receive an honorarium of $400 for each day spent at a meeting of the board or at a meeting of a subcommittee of the board or at a public meeting as a representative of the board, including a day in which a trustee travels to or from a meeting. Trustees who are state employees are entitled to administrative leave for service as a trustee. Trustees who are employees of a political subdivision of the state or a school district or regional educational attendance area in the state are entitled to leave benefits provided by their employers comparable to those provided to state employees for service as a trustee. Trustees are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 62 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 37.10.260.
Staff.

The Department of Revenue shall provide staff for the board.

The board may designate a trustee or an officer or employee of the Department of Revenue to be responsible for signing on behalf of the board a deed, contract, or other document that must be executed by or on behalf of the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.10.270.
Investment advisory council.

The board may appoint an investment advisory council composed of at least three and not more than five members. Members of the council shall possess experience and expertise in financial investments and management of investment portfolios for public, corporate, or union pension benefit funds, foundations, or endowments.

Members of the council serve at the pleasure of the board for staggered terms of three years.

The board shall establish the compensation of members of the council. Members of the council are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

The council shall

review the investments made by the board;

make recommendations to the board concerning the board’s investment policies, investment strategy, and investment procedures;

advise the board on selection of performance consultants and on the form and content of annual reports;

provide other advice as requested by the board.

With approval of the board, the council may contract with other state agencies to provide investment advice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 63 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 112, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendments to (a) of this section made by ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, are retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 37.10.280.
Insurance.

The board shall ensure that trusteed assets and its own services are protected. The board may purchase insurance or provide for self-insurance retention in amounts recommended by the commissioner of revenue and approved by the board to cover the acts, including fiduciary acts, errors, and omissions of its board members and agents. Insurance must protect the board and the state from liability to others and from loss of trusteed assets due to the acts or omissions of the trustees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.10.290.
Exemption from taxation.

Except as provided in AS

29.45.030(a)

for property acquired through foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure, the board and all properties at any time owned by it, managed by it, or held by it in trust, and the income from those activities, are exempt from all taxes and assessments in the state. All security instruments issued by the board and income from them are exempt from all taxes and assessments in the state, including transfer taxes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.10.300.
Limitations.

The board may not engage in commercial banking activity or private trust activity. The board may not act as a depository or trustee for a private person, association, or corporation. The board may not act as a lender to a private person, association, or corporation of money from any source except state funds under management by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.10.310.
Pension forfeiture by public officers convicted of crimes involving corruption.

A public officer, as defined in AS

39.52.960

, a legislator, or a person employed as a legislative director, as that term is defined in AS

24.60.990

, who is convicted of a federal or state felony offense of bribery, receiving a bribe, perjury, subornation of perjury, scheme to defraud, fraud, mail fraud, misuse of funds, corruption, or tax evasion may not receive a state pension benefit if the offense was committed on or after July 10, 2007 and was in connection with the person’s official duties.

Pension benefits and employee contributions that accrue to a person before the date of the person’s commission of the offense described in (a) of this section are not diminished or impaired by that subsection.

A state pension benefit under (a) of this section does not include

insurance, voluntary wage reductions, involuntary wage reductions, or supplemental or health benefits under AS

39.30.090

—

39.30.495

or former AS 39.37.145;

member or employee contributions under AS

14.25.050

,

14.25.055

,

14.25.075

,

14.25.340

,

14.25.360(a)

, AS

22.25.011

, AS

39.35.160

,

39.35.165(f)

,

39.35.180

,

39.35.730

,

39.35.760(a)

, or former AS 39.37.070.

In a pension forfeiture matter under this section, the board may award to a spouse, dependent, or former spouse of the person governed by the limitations in (a) of this section some or all of the amount that, but for the forfeiture under (a) of this section, may otherwise be payable. In determining whether to make an award under this subsection, the board shall consider the totality of circumstances, including

the role, if any, of the person’s spouse, dependent, or former spouse in connection with the illegal conduct for which the person was convicted; and

the degree of knowledge, if any, possessed by the person’s spouse, dependent, or former spouse in connection with the illegal conduct for which the person was convicted.

History.

(§ 50 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section, see AS

14.25.212

, AS

14.25.532

, AS

22.25.800

, AS

39.35.672

, and AS

39.35.932

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 76, ch. 47, SLA 2007, the provisions of this section “apply to benefits under former AS 39.37 (elected public officers’ retirement system).”

Sec. 37.10.390.
Definitions.

In AS

37.10.210

—

37.10.390

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“board” means the board of trustees of the Alaska Retirement Management Board;

“fund” means the fund or funds composed of the assets of each of the retirement systems administered and managed by the board;

“recognized competence” means a minimum of 10 years’ professional experience working or teaching in the field of investment management, finance, banking, economics, accounting, pension administration, or actuarial analysis;

“retirement systems” or “systems” means the teachers’ retirement system, the judicial retirement system, the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system, the public employees’ retirement system, the State of Alaska Teachers’ and Public Employees’ Retiree Health Reimbursement Arrangement Plan, and the elected public officers’ retirement system under former AS 39.37.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 64 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)